test/src/morphology/Num-kaksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - kakš: # quantifiers 218 'eng /est kaks/fin' - full paradigm
     kakš+Num+Sg+Nom: kakš
     kakš+Num+Sg+Gen: kǭʼd
     kakš+Num+Sg+Par: kǭʼdtõ
     kakš+Num+Sg+Dat: kǭʼdõn
     kakš+Num+Sg+Ins: kǭʼdkõks
     kakš+Num+Sg+Ill: kǭʼdõ
     kakš+Num+Sg+Ela: kǭʼdstõ
     kakš+Num+Pl+Nom: kǭʼd
     kakš+Num+Pl+Gen: kǭʼd
     kakš+Num+Pl+Par: kakši
     kakš+Num+Pl+Dat: kǭʼdõn
     kakš+Num+Pl+Ins: kǭʼdkõks
     kakš+Num+Pl+Ill: kǭʼdiž
     kakš+Num+Pl+Ela: kǭʼdšti
